Utah statutes.
53A-6-105.    Licensing fees -- Credit to subfund -- Payment of expenses.

(1)  The board shall levy a fee for each new, renewed, or reinstated license or endorsement in accordance with Section 63J-1-504.

(2)  Fee payments are credited to the Professional Practices Restricted Subfund in the Uniform School Fund.

(3)  The board shall pay the expenses of issuing licenses and of UPPAC operations, and the costs of collecting license fees from the restricted subfund.

(4)  The office shall submit an annual report to the Legislature's Public Education Appropriations Subcommittee informing the Legislature about the fund, fees assessed and collected, and expenditures from the fund.

